District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

22-5204

Kosher meat — Sale; labeling; signs displayed where kosher and nonkosher meats sold

Repealed.

Dec. 1, 1982, D.C. Law 4-164, § 602(ss)-(uu), 29 DCR 3976
1981 Ed., §§ 22-3404 to 22-3406.